District of Columbia statutes.
19-321

Descent through alien ancestor no bar.

In making title by descent it is no bar to a party claiming as heir that an ancestor, whether living or dead, through whom he derives his descent from the intestate, is or has been an alien.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 700, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-321.
1973 Ed., § 19-321.